Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202576-3401
Act, how cited.

Sections 76-3401 to 76-3424 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Uniform Real Property Transfer on Death Act.

Laws 2012, LB536, § 1;

Laws 2025, LB422, § 1.